Massachusetts, session 194th, S2054.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2010 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following
subparagraph:-
(16) An amount as described in section 62(a)(2)(D) of the Code for certain expenses of
elementary and secondary school teachers, only to the extent the amount is not otherwise
deducted under subparagraph (7).
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall be effective for tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
of 1